District of Columbia statutes.
4-1305.04

Payment of processing fees and costs.

(a)

A person who is required to have a criminal records check under this part shall pay for:

(1)

The mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of Investigation for conducting the national criminal records check;

(2)

Reasonable administrative costs to the police for accessing the District criminal records history; and

(3)

Reasonable administrative costs to the Agency.

(b)

The Agency or a licensed child-placing agency may pay for processing fees and costs.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title V, § 504, formerly § 324
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 201(f), 47 DCR 2850
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 2(u), 48 DCR 2043
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 22(a)(5), 53 DCR 6794
This section is referenced in § 4-1305.03.
D.C. Law 13-277 substituted “Agency” for “Department” throughout the section.
D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 4-1305.01.
For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.